Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 20 Special Stops Required

31-20-1.
When railroad crossing stops required of all vehicles.

Whenever any person driving a vehicle approaches a railroad grade crossing under any of the circumstances stated in this section the driver of the vehicle shall stop within fifty feet (50´) but not less than fifteen feet (15´) from the nearest rail of the railroad, and shall not proceed until he or she can do so safely. These foregoing requirements shall apply when:

A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad train;

A crossing gate is lowered or when a human flagman gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of a railroad train;

A railroad train approaching within approximately one thousand five hundred feet (1,500´) of the highway crossing emits a signal audible from that distance, and the railroad train, by reason of its speed or nearness to the crossing, is an immediate hazard;

An approaching railroad train is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity to the crossing.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-1

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 117.

31-20-2.
Driving through railroad gate or barrier.

No person shall drive any vehicle through, around, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad grade crossing while the gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-2

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 117.

31-20-3.
Stop signs at dangerous railroad crossings.

The state traffic commission and local authorities with the approval of the state traffic commission are authorized to designate particularly dangerous highway grade crossings of railroads and to erect stop signs at those crossings. When the stop signs are erected, the driver of any vehicle shall stop within fifty feet (50´) but not less than fifteen feet (15´) from the nearest rail of the railroad and shall proceed only upon exercising due care.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-3

.

31-20-4.
Vehicles required to stop at all railroads — Exceptions.

The driver of any motor vehicle carrying passengers for hire, or of any school bus carrying any school child, or of any vehicle carrying explosive substances or flammable liquids as a cargo or part of a cargo, before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, shall stop the vehicle within fifty feet (50´) but not less than fifteen feet (15´) from the nearest rail of such railroad, and while so stopped, shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train, and for signals indicating the approach of a train, except as provided in this chapter, and shall not proceed until he or she can do so safely. After stopping as required in this section and upon proceeding when it is safe to do so, the driver of the vehicle shall cross only in a gear of the vehicle that there will be no necessity for changing gears while traversing the crossing, and the driver shall not shift gears while crossing the track or tracks.

No stop need be made at any crossing where a police officer or a traffic control signal directs traffic to proceed.

This section shall not apply at railroad grade crossings within a business or residence district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-4

.

31-20-5.
Moving of heavy equipment over railroad crossings.

No person shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of ten (10) or less miles per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than one-half inch per foot of the distance between any two adjacent axles, or in any event, of less than nine inches (9"), measured above the level surface of a roadway, upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing, without first complying with this section.

Notice of the intended crossing shall be given to a station agent of the railroad, and a reasonable time shall be given to the railroad to provide proper protection at the crossing.

Before making the crossing, the person operating or moving the vehicle or equipment shall first stop the same not less than fifteen feet (15´) nor more than fifty feet (50´) from the nearest rail of the railroad and, while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train and for signals indicating the approach of a train, and shall not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No crossing shall be made when warning is given by automatic signal or crossing gates or a flagperson or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or car. If a flagperson is provided by the railroad, movement over the crossing shall be under the flagperson’s direction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-5

.

31-20-6.
Designation of through highways — Erection of stop and yield signs.

The state traffic commission with reference to state highways, and local authorities with reference to other highways under their jurisdiction, may designate through highways and erect stop and yield signs at special entrances to them, or may designate any intersection as a stop and yield intersection and erect like signs at one or more entrances to the intersection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-6

; P.L. 1966, ch. 70, § 1.

31-20-7.
Specifications for stop signs.

A stop sign shall bear the word “stop” in letters not less than six inches (6") in height, and the sign shall at nighttime be rendered luminous by steady or flashing internal illumination, by a fixed floodlight projected on the face of the sign, or by efficient reflecting elements on the face of the sign.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-7

.

31-20-8.
Placement of stop signs.

Every stop sign shall be erected as near as practicable to the nearest line of the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection. If there is no crosswalk then it shall be placed as close as practicable to the nearest line of the roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-8

.

31-20-9.
Obedience to stop signs.

Every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection. In the event there is no crosswalk, the driver shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting highway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting highway before entering the intersection, except when directed to proceed by a police officer or traffic control signal. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-9

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 117.

31-20-10.
Vehicles emerging from alleys, driveways, and buildings.

The driver of a vehicle within a business or residence district emerging from an alley, driveway, or building shall stop the vehicle immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across any alleyway or private driveway, and shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian as may be necessary to avoid collision. Upon entering the roadway the driver shall yield the right of way to all vehicles approaching on the roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-10

.

31-20-10.1, 31-20-10.2.
[Reserved.]

31-20-10.3.
School bus stops — Routes.

No school bus shall stop to discharge or pick up passengers at any intersection where a traffic control device as defined in §

31-1-28

controls the movement of the bus.

No school bus shall stop to discharge or pick up passengers at any location which would require a child to cross any road where the posted speed limit is greater than thirty-five miles per hour (35 mph). School bus stops shall be developed in such a manner which assures that the bus stop will be on the child’s home side of the road so that the child does not have to cross the road to board the bus or to reach home.

No school superintendent, school committee, contractor, or school bus owner shall put into effect any school bus route which cannot be completed in the time allotted without exceeding posted speed limits.

All school bus routes shall be reviewed by the local police chief of each city and town for safety hazards within ninety (90) days before the start of the school year.

Any party may appeal the decision of a local police chief approving or disapproving any bus route or stop to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education who shall hold a hearing as provided in §

16-39-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 401, § 2.

31-20-10.4.
Exemption from discharge requirements of § 31-20-10.3.

Rural communities are exempted from the provisions of §

31-20-10.3(b)

when:

A school bus is turning one hundred and eighty degrees (180 degrees) on a road;

A school bus is backing up on a road; or

A school bus is stopping on a road of low traffic flow.

For purposes of this section, “rural community” means any community in which there is a regionalized school district and the towns of Burrillville, Scituate, Little Compton, and New Shoreham.

For purposes of this section, “low traffic flow” means any road designated as a road with low traffic flow by the state traffic commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 427, § 1.

31-20-11.
Marking of school buses — Penalty for violation.

Every bus used for the transportation of school children shall be painted yellow and bear upon the front and rear of it a plainly visible sign containing the words “school bus” in black letters not less than eight inches (8") in height. Every bus shall also bear on the right and left side the name of the school district for which the bus is transporting children in letters not less than four inches (4") in height and shall be painted black. Any bus being used for the transportation of persons, the majority of whom are under the age of eighteen (18) may display such a sign.

Except as provided in this section, when a school bus is operated upon a street or highway for purposes other than the actual transportation of children, all marking indicating “school bus” shall be covered or concealed. Whenever any school bus is sold and/or is no longer used for the purpose of transporting children, its color shall be changed from national school bus chrome or any other shade of yellow to any other color, and the four (4) flashing warning lights shall be removed before the vehicle can be registered or reregistered for any purpose other than the transportation of school children.

The division of motor vehicles shall require proof of the change of color and other modifications prior to registering the vehicle.

Every school bus shall display a sign located below the rear window of the bus which reads “unlawful to pass when red lights are flashing”. The sign shall have black letters not less than four inches (4") nor more than six inches (6") high on a white reflective background.

Any person, firm, or corporation found in violation of this section shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-11

; P.L. 1968, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 454, § 1.

31-20-11.1.
Signaling of stops for school buses.

No school bus driver while transporting school children shall stop the school bus without first having actuated the flashing lights at least one hundred feet (100´) prior to the scheduled school bus stop.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 250, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 31-30-11.1.

31-20-12.
Stopping for school bus required — Penalty for violation.

The driver of a vehicle upon a street, highway, private way, private or public parking area upon meeting or overtaking from any direction any bus marked as “school bus” whenever the bus is being operated in accordance with §

31-20-11

and on which there is in operation flashing red lights, shall stop the vehicle before reaching the bus. The driver shall not proceed until the bus resumes motion or until the flashing lights are no longer actuated. No driver of any motor vehicle, except emergency vehicles on official business, shall travel in the same lane of traffic behind a school bus at a distance of less than fifty feet (50´). A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) and/or suspension of driving license for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days for the first offense, and a mandatory fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and/or revocation of driving license for a period of one year for each subsequent offense.

A peace officer may issue a summons based on the statement or testimony of a school bus driver or monitor or other private citizen provided that the statement or testimony provides the peace officer with sufficient probable cause that a violation under this section was committed. Any conviction under this section may be punished in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-12

; P.L. 1965, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 510, § 1.

31-20-12.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 287, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 359, § 2, and by P.L. 2000, ch. 510, § 2, effective July 20, 2000, and July 22, 2000, respectively.

31-20-13.
School buses stopped on divided highway or in loading zone.

When operating a vehicle upon a highway, the driver need not stop upon meeting or passing a bus marked as “school bus” in accordance with §

31-20-11

in the following circumstances:

When a highway is a divided highway and the bus is stopped in the roadway on one side of the divided highway and the driver is operating on the other side of it.

When the bus is stopped in a loading zone adjacent to a limited access highway and pedestrians are not permitted to cross the highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-13

; P.L. 1968, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 89, § 2.

31-20-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 31, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1968, ch. 40, § 2.

31-20-15.
Posting of bridle path signs.

The department of revenue shall in all parks and reservations, and the traffic safety commission shall on all state highways, erect and maintain adequate signs requiring operators of motor vehicles to come to a complete stop because of the existence of a bridle path where saddle horses may cross the roads in the parks and reservation and/or state highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1642, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-15

; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 16; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 16.

31-20-16.
Stops at bridle path crossings.

Every operator of a motor vehicle shall bring his or her motor vehicle to a complete stop in parks and reservations and on state highways where the department of revenue or state traffic commission has posted signs of bridle paths where saddle horses may cross the roads in the parks and reservations and/or highways.

An operator violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation, and upon conviction, shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for second or subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1642, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-20-16

; P.L. 1988, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 16; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 16.

31-20-17.
Stopping for crossing guards and school bus monitors required.

The driver of a vehicle upon a street or highway, upon meeting or approaching from any direction a crossing guard, shall stop the vehicle before reaching the crossing guard. The driver shall not proceed until signaled to proceed by the crossing guard or until the crossing guard has completed his or her duties of aiding the pedestrian safely to the sidewalk.

The driver of any vehicle upon a street or highway, upon meeting or approaching from any direction a school bus monitor, shall stop the vehicle in accordance with §

31-20-12

and shall not proceed until the requirements of §

31-20-12

are met.

A person convicted of a violation of this section may be punished by a fine not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) and/or suspension of his or her driving license for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days for the first offense, and a fine not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and/or suspension of his or her driving license for a period of one year for each subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 399, § 1.

31-20-17.1.
Private complaint — Stopping for crossing guard/bus monitor required.

Upon receipt of a private complaint, in writing and signed by the complainant, the traffic tribunal shall by letter notify the violator to respond in writing within twenty (20) days to the allegations of the complaint. Failure to respond to the letter will result in the person being notified to appear before a judge of the traffic tribunal and show cause why his or her license should not be suspended. Failure to appear at the hearing will result in the suspension of the person’s license until such time as the person does appear.

On any second or subsequent violation within one year, the person shall be issued a summons to appear for a hearing, and failure to appear will result in the suspension of the person’s license until such time as the person does appear.

At any hearing resulting from any violation, the complainant shall also appear at the hearing. A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished in accordance with the penalties set forth in §

31-20-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 401, § 2.

31-20-17.2.
Private complaint — Stopping for crossing guard/bus monitor required — Central Falls.

The following procedure shall apply to first offenses in Central Falls reported by private complaint:

Upon receipt of a private complaint, in writing and signed by the complainant, the Central Falls municipal court shall by certified mail, return receipt requested, notify the violator to respond in writing within twenty (20) days to the allegations of the complaint.

Failure to respond to the letter will result in the person being notified to appear before a judge of the Central Falls municipal court to show cause why he or she should not be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for his or her failure to respond.

Failure to appear at the hearing at that time will result in the person being fined one hundred dollars ($100).

All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be forwarded by the Central Falls municipal court to the city of Central Falls.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 314, § 2.